Hawaii statutes.
§346D-3 Determination of eligibility for
participation in a waiver program. (a) To qualify for participation in a
waiver program, individuals shall:

(1) Be determined by the department of human services
to be eligible for federally-funded medicaid assistance;

(2) Be certified by the department of human services,
through the preadmission screening process, to be in need of acute, skilled
nursing facility, intermediate care facility, or intermediate care facility for
individuals with intellectual disabilities level of care; and

(3) Choose to remain in the community with the
provision of home and community-based waiver program services as an alternative
to institutionalization.

(b) Individuals approved for a waiver program
shall have the following:

(1) Comprehensive assessment of their health,
functional, social, and environmental needs;

(2) Written service plan that addresses the necessary
safeguards to protect the health and welfare of the individual, and reflects
the individual's freedom of choice of providers and services;

(3) Budget based on the services defined in the
service plan; and

(4) Periodic review of their health, functional, and
financial status to ensure continued eligibility for waiver program services.
[L 1983, c 192, §4; am L 1985, c 207, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 134, pt of §1; am
L 1988, c 208, pt of §3; am L 1998, c 294, §4; am L 2011, c 220, §11]

Cross References

Chore services, see §346-64.5.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next